Florida, session 2026, HB1453.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
155
156 Section 1. Subsection (4) of section 409.904, Florida
157 Statutes, is amended to read:
158 409.904 Optional payments for eligible persons.—The agency
159 may make payments for medical assistance and related services on
160 behalf of the following persons who are determined to be
161 eligible subject to the income, assets, and categorical
162 eligibility tests set forth in federal and state law. Payment on
163 behalf of these Medicaid eligible persons is subject to the
164 availability of moneys and any limitations established by the
165 General Appropriations Act or chapter 216.
166 (4) A low-income person who meets all other requirements
167 for Medicaid eligibility except citizenship and who is in need
168 of emergency medical services. The eligibility of such a
169 recipient is limited to the period of the emergency, in
170 accordance with federal regulations. The agency may conduct
171 retrospective reviews or audits of services rendered to the
172 individual and claims submitted by the provider to validate the
173 existence and duration of the emergency medical condition and
174 whether the services rendered were necessary to treat the
175 emergency medical condition regardless of whether the provider
Page 7 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
176 obtained prior authorization for the services.
177 Section 2. Section 409.9041, Florida Statutes, is created
178 to read:
179 409.9041 Medicaid work and community engagement
180 requirements.—
181 (1)(a) The Legislature finds that assisting able-bodied
182 adult Medicaid recipients in achieving self-sufficiency through
183 meaningful work and community engagement is essential to
184 ensuring that the state Medicaid program remains a sustainable
185 resource for residents who are most in need of such assistance.
186 (b) The agency, in coordination with the department, shall
187 implement mandatory work and community engagement requirements
188 for able-bodied adults as a condition of obtaining and
189 maintaining coverage under the state Medicaid program.
190 (2) The agency shall seek federal approval to implement
191 mandatory work and community engagement requirements for certain
192 populations, as specified in this section, as a condition of
193 obtaining and maintaining coverage under the state Medicaid
194 program.
195 (3)(a) Medicaid recipients between the ages of 18 and 64
196 years must meet the work or community engagement requirements of
197 this section, unless they are one of the following:
198 1. Indian as defined under 42 C.F.R. s. 438.14(a).
199 2. A parent, guardian, caretaker relative, or family
200 caregiver of a dependent child younger than 6 years of age or of
Page 8 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
201 a disabled individual. For purposes of this paragraph, the term
202 "family caregiver" means an adult family member or other
203 individual who has a significant relationship with, and who
204 provides a broad range of assistance to, an individual with a
205 chronic or other health condition, disability, or functional
206 limitation.
207 3. Former foster youth younger than 23 years of age.
208 4. A veteran with a total disability, as specified under
209 38 C.F.R. s. 3.340 or as specified by a Veteran Affairs
210 Disability Ratings Letter issued by the United States Department
211 of Veterans Affairs.
212 5. An individual classified as medically frail under the
213 Medicaid Institutionalized Care Program; categorized as aged,
214 blind, or disabled under the state Medicaid program; or who has
215 a developmental disability as defined in s. 393.063.
216 6. An individual living in a household that receives
217 Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits and who is
218 already in compliance with work requirements pursuant to s.
219 445.024.
220 7. An individual participating in a residential substance
221 use disorder treatment program.
222 8. An inmate of a public institution.
223 9. A woman eligible for Medicaid coverage in a pregnancy-
224 related or postpartum care category.
225 (b) A person may satisfy the work or community engagement
Page 9 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
226 requirements of this section by participating in one or more of
227 the following activities for at least 80 hours per month:
228 1. Paid employment.
229 2. On-the-job-training.
230 3. Vocational educational training.
231 4. Job skills training directly related to employment.
232 5. Education directly related to employment.
233 6. Satisfactory attendance at a secondary school or in a
234 course of study leading to a high school equivalency diploma.
235 7. Enrollment at least half-time as defined in 34 C.F.R.
236 s. 668.2(b) in a postsecondary education program to obtain a
237 credential on the Master Credentials List as maintained pursuant
238 to s. 445.004(6)(e).
239 8. Any other work activity designated as such by the
240 Department of Commerce and provided by a local workforce
241 development board pursuant to s. 445.024.
242 (c) Parents with children ages 6 through 18 are required
243 to engage in work or community engagement activities only during
244 standard school hours.
245 (4)(a) Notwithstanding any other statutory provision, in
246 order to maintain Medicaid coverage, an eligible Medicaid
247 recipient must, before enrollment and upon any redetermination
248 for coverage, demonstrate compliance with the work or community
249 engagement requirements of this section.
250 (b) The agency shall develop a process for ensuring
Page 10 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
251 compliance with this section which aligns, to the extent
252 possible, with the processes currently in place relating to work
253 and community engagement requirements authorized under the
254 state's Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, including,
255 but not limited to, participant registration with a local
256 CareerSource center, employment and training programs, and
257 collaboration with the state's local workforce boards.
258 (c) The department shall verify, in accordance with its
259 procedures, that an individual subject to the work and community
260 engagement requirements of this section demonstrates compliance
261 during the individual's regularly scheduled redetermination of
262 eligibility, or more frequently as determined by the department.
263 (5) The agency, in coordination with the department, shall
264 conduct outreach regarding the implementation of the work and
265 community engagement requirements of this section. The outreach
266 much include, at a minimum, notification to impacted
267 individuals, including timelines for implementation,
268 requirements for compliance, penalties for noncompliance, and
269 information on how to request an exemption.
270 (6) If a recipient subject to the work and community
271 engagement requirements of this section is determined to be in
272 noncompliance with such requirements, the agency, in
273 coordination with the department, must notify the recipient of
274 the finding of noncompliance and the impact to his or her
275 eligibility for continued receipt of Medicaid services. The
Page 11 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
276 notice must include, at a minimum, notification of all of the
277 following:
278 (a) That the recipient is eligible for a grace period of
279 30 days to either come into compliance with the requirements or
280 request an exemption from the requirements and that Medicaid
281 coverage of services will continue during the grace period.
282 (b) That if, following the 30-day period, the individual
283 has not come into compliance with or requested an exemption from
284 the work and community engagement requirements, his or her
285 application for assistance will be denied and services
286 terminated at the end of the month following the month in which
287 such 30-calendar-day period ends.
288 (c) The right of the individual to request a fair hearing
289 if he or she is determined to be noncompliant with program
290 requirements and disenrolled from the state Medicaid program.
291 (d) How he or she can reapply for medical assistance under
292 the state Medicaid program.
293 Section 3. Paragraph (f) is added to subsection (5) of
294 section 409.905, Florida Statutes, to read:
295 409.905 Mandatory Medicaid services.—The agency may make
296 payments for the following services, which are required of the
297 state by Title XIX of the Social Security Act, furnished by
298 Medicaid providers to recipients who are determined to be
299 eligible on the dates on which the services were provided. Any
300 service under this section shall be provided only when medically
Page 12 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
301 necessary and in accordance with state and federal law.
302 Mandatory services rendered by providers in mobile units to
303 Medicaid recipients may be restricted by the agency. Nothing in
304 this section shall be construed to prevent or limit the agency
305 from adjusting fees, reimbursement rates, lengths of stay,
306 number of visits, number of services, or any other adjustments
307 necessary to comply with the availability of moneys and any
308 limitations or directions provided for in the General
309 Appropriations Act or chapter 216.
310 (5) HOSPITAL INPATIENT SERVICES.—The agency shall pay for
311 all covered services provided for the medical care and treatment
312 of a recipient who is admitted as an inpatient by a licensed
313 physician or dentist to a hospital licensed under part I of
314 chapter 395. However, the agency shall limit the payment for
315 inpatient hospital services for a Medicaid recipient 21 years of
316 age or older to 45 days or the number of days necessary to
317 comply with the General Appropriations Act.
318 (f) In its coverage of services under this subsection, the
319 agency shall maintain cost-effective purchasing practices as
320 required by s. 409.912.
321 Section 4. Present subsections (14) through (29) of
322 section 409.906, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as
323 subsections (15) through (30), respectively, and a new
324 subsection (14) is added to that section, to read:
325 409.906 Optional Medicaid services.—Subject to specific
Page 13 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
326 appropriations, the agency may make payments for services which
327 are optional to the state under Title XIX of the Social Security
328 Act and are furnished by Medicaid providers to recipients who
329 are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services
330 were provided. Any optional service that is provided shall be
331 provided only when medically necessary and in accordance with
332 state and federal law. Optional services rendered by providers
333 in mobile units to Medicaid recipients may be restricted or
334 prohibited by the agency. Nothing in this section shall be
335 construed to prevent or limit the agency from adjusting fees,
336 reimbursement rates, lengths of stay, number of visits, or
337 number of services, or making any other adjustments necessary to
338 comply with the availability of moneys and any limitations or
339 directions provided for in the General Appropriations Act or
340 chapter 216. If necessary to safeguard the state's systems of
341 providing services to elderly and disabled persons and subject
342 to the notice and review provisions of s. 216.177, the Governor
343 may direct the Agency for Health Care Administration to amend
344 the Medicaid state plan to delete the optional Medicaid service
345 known as "Intermediate Care Facilities for the Developmentally
346 Disabled." Optional services may include:
347 (14) HOME- AND COMMUNITY-BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
348 SERVICES.—The agency shall seek federal approval to implement a
349 program that covers an expanded array of home- and community-
350 based services for adults 18 years of age and older diagnosed
Page 14 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
351 with a serious mental illness who are high utilizers of
352 behavioral health services in an institutional setting. The
353 program must be designed to reduce the need for institutional
354 levels of care for adults with a serious mental illness. The
355 agency shall work in coordination with the Department of
356 Children and Families to develop and implement the program upon
357 receiving federal approval.
358 Section 5. Section 409.91195, Florida Statutes, is amended
359 to read:
360 409.91195 Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics
361 Committee.—There is created a Medicaid Pharmaceutical and
362 Therapeutics Committee within the agency for the purpose of
363 developing a Medicaid preferred drug list, a Medicaid preferred
364 physician-administered drug list, a Medicaid preferred product
365 list, and a high-cost drug list.
366 (1) The committee shall be composed of 11 members
367 appointed by the Governor. Four members shall be physicians,
368 licensed under chapter 458; one member licensed under chapter
369 459; five members shall be pharmacists licensed under chapter
370 465; and one member shall be a consumer representative. The
371 members shall be appointed to serve for terms of 2 years from
372 the date of their appointment. Members may be appointed to more
373 than one term. The agency shall serve as staff for the committee
374 and assist them with all ministerial duties. The Governor shall
375 ensure that at least some of the members of the committee
Page 15 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
376 represent Medicaid participating physicians and pharmacies
377 serving all segments and diversity of the Medicaid population,
378 and have experience in either developing or practicing under a
379 preferred drug list. At least one of the members shall represent
380 the interests of pharmaceutical manufacturers.
381 (2) Committee members shall select a chairperson and a
382 vice chairperson each year from the committee membership.
383 (3) The committee shall meet at least quarterly and may
384 meet at other times at the discretion of the chairperson and
385 members. The committee shall comply with rules adopted by the
386 agency, including notice of any meeting of the committee
387 pursuant to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure
388 Act.
389 (4) Upon recommendation of the committee, the agency shall
390 adopt a preferred drug list, a preferred physician-administered
391 drug list, a preferred product list, and a high-cost drug list
392 as described in s. 409.912(5). To the extent feasible, the
393 committee shall review all drug or product classes included on
394 the preferred drug list, the preferred physician-administered
395 drug list, and the preferred product list every 12 months, and
396 the high-cost drug list every 6 months. The committee may
397 recommend additions to and deletions from the lists preferred
398 drug list, such that the lists provide preferred drug list
399 provides for medically appropriate drug and product therapies
400 for Medicaid patients which achieve cost savings contained in
Page 16 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
401 the General Appropriations Act.
402 (5) Except for antiretroviral drugs, reimbursement of
403 drugs not included on the preferred drug list, preferred
404 physician-administered drug list, preferred product list, or
405 high-cost drug list is subject to prior authorization.
406 (6) The agency shall publish and disseminate the preferred
407 drug list, preferred physician-administered drug list, preferred
408 product list, and high-cost drug list to all Medicaid providers
409 in the state by Internet posting on the agency's website or in
410 other media.
411 (7) The committee shall ensure that interested parties,
412 including pharmaceutical manufacturers agreeing to provide a
413 supplemental rebate as outlined in this chapter, have an
414 opportunity to present public testimony to the committee with
415 information or evidence supporting inclusion of a drug or
416 product on the preferred drug list, preferred physician-
417 administered drug list, or preferred product list. Such public
418 testimony shall occur before prior to any recommendations made
419 by the committee for inclusion or exclusion from the preferred
420 drug list, preferred physician-administered drug list, or
421 preferred product list. Upon timely notice, the agency shall
422 ensure that any drug that has been approved or had any of its
423 particular uses approved by the United States Food and Drug
424 Administration under a priority review classification will be
425 reviewed by the committee at the next regularly scheduled
Page 17 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
426 meeting following 3 months of distribution of the drug to the
427 general public.
428 (8) The committee shall develop its preferred drug list,
429 preferred physician-administered drug list, preferred product
430 list, and high-cost drug list recommendations by considering the
431 clinical efficacy, safety, and cost-effectiveness of a product.
432 (9) The Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee
433 may also make recommendations to the agency regarding the prior
434 authorization of any prescribed drug covered by Medicaid.
435 (10) Medicaid recipients may appeal agency preferred drug
436 formulary decisions using the Medicaid fair hearing process
437 administered by the Agency for Health Care Administration.
438 Section 6. Paragraph (a) of subsection (5) of section
439 409.912, Florida Statutes, is amended, and subsection (14) is
440 added to that section, to read:
441 409.912 Cost-effective purchasing of health care.—The
442 agency shall purchase goods and services for Medicaid recipients
443 in the most cost-effective manner consistent with the delivery
444 of quality medical care. To ensure that medical services are
445 effectively utilized, the agency may, in any case, require a
446 confirmation or second physician's opinion of the correct
447 diagnosis for purposes of authorizing future services under the
448 Medicaid program. This section does not restrict access to
449 emergency services or poststabilization care services as defined
450 in 42 C.F.R. s. 438.114. Such confirmation or second opinion
Page 18 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
451 shall be rendered in a manner approved by the agency. The agency
452 shall maximize the use of prepaid per capita and prepaid
453 aggregate fixed-sum basis services when appropriate and other
454 alternative service delivery and reimbursement methodologies,
455 including competitive bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, designed
456 to facilitate the cost-effective purchase of a case-managed
457 continuum of care. The agency shall also require providers to
458 minimize the exposure of recipients to the need for acute
459 inpatient, custodial, and other institutional care and the
460 inappropriate or unnecessary use of high-cost services. The
461 agency shall contract with a vendor to monitor and evaluate the
462 clinical practice patterns of providers in order to identify
463 trends that are outside the normal practice patterns of a
464 provider's professional peers or the national guidelines of a
465 provider's professional association. The vendor must be able to
466 provide information and counseling to a provider whose practice
467 patterns are outside the norms, in consultation with the agency,
468 to improve patient care and reduce inappropriate utilization.
469 The agency may mandate prior authorization, drug therapy
470 management, or disease management participation for certain
471 populations of Medicaid beneficiaries, certain drug classes, or
472 particular drugs to prevent fraud, abuse, overuse, and possible
473 dangerous drug interactions. The Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics
474 Committee shall make recommendations to the agency on drugs for
475 which prior authorization is required. The agency shall inform
Page 19 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
476 the Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee of its decisions
477 regarding drugs subject to prior authorization. The agency is
478 authorized to limit the entities it contracts with or enrolls as
479 Medicaid providers by developing a provider network through
480 provider credentialing. The agency may competitively bid single-
481 source-provider contracts if procurement of goods or services
482 results in demonstrated cost savings to the state without
483 limiting access to care. The agency may limit its network based
484 on the assessment of beneficiary access to care, provider
485 availability, provider quality standards, time and distance
486 standards for access to care, the cultural competence of the
487 provider network, demographic characteristics of Medicaid
488 beneficiaries, practice and provider-to-beneficiary standards,
489 appointment wait times, beneficiary use of services, provider
490 turnover, provider profiling, provider licensure history,
491 previous program integrity investigations and findings, peer
492 review, provider Medicaid policy and billing compliance records,
493 clinical and medical record audits, and other factors. Providers
494 are not entitled to enrollment in the Medicaid provider network.
495 The agency shall determine instances in which allowing Medicaid
496 beneficiaries to purchase durable medical equipment and other
497 goods is less expensive to the Medicaid program than long-term
498 rental of the equipment or goods. The agency may establish rules
499 to facilitate purchases in lieu of long-term rentals in order to
500 protect against fraud and abuse in the Medicaid program as
Page 20 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
501 defined in s. 409.913. The agency may seek federal waivers
502 necessary to administer these policies.
503 (5)(a) The agency shall implement a Medicaid prescribed-
504 drug spending-control program that includes the following
505 components:
506 1. A Medicaid preferred drug list and a Medicaid
507 physician-administered drug list. The preferred drug list, which
508 shall be a listing of cost-effective therapeutic options
509 recommended by the Medicaid Pharmacy and Therapeutics Committee
510 established pursuant to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency
511 for each therapeutic class on the preferred drug list. At the
512 discretion of the committee, and when feasible, the preferred
513 drug list should include at least two products in a therapeutic
514 class. The physician-administered drug list shall be a listing
515 of physician-administered drugs covered by the state Medicaid
516 program, based on the United States Food and Drug
517 Administration's approved indications and compendia in 42 U.S.C.
518 s. 1396r-8(g)(1)(B). Within the preferred physician-administered
519 drug list, there must be a section containing a list of
520 preferred physician-administered drugs that are cost-effective
521 therapeutic options recommended by the Medicaid Pharmaceutical
522 and Therapeutics Committee established pursuant to s. 409.91195.
523 The physician-administered drug list must be updated at least
524 twice a year. The agency may post and update the preferred drug
525 list and the preferred physician-administered drug updates to
Page 21 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
526 the list on an Internet website without following the rulemaking
527 procedures of chapter 120. Antiretroviral agents are excluded
528 from the preferred drug list. The agency shall also limit the
529 amount of a prescribed drug dispensed to no more than a 34-day
530 supply unless the drug products' smallest marketed package is
531 greater than a 34-day supply, or the drug is determined by the
532 agency to be a maintenance drug in which case a 100-day maximum
533 supply may be authorized. The agency may seek any federal
534 waivers necessary to implement these cost-control programs and
535 to continue participation in the federal Medicaid rebate
536 program, or alternatively to negotiate state-only manufacturer
537 rebates. The agency may adopt rules to administer this
538 subparagraph. The agency shall continue to provide unlimited
539 contraceptive drugs and items. The agency must establish
540 procedures to ensure that:
541 a. There is a response to a request for prior
542 authorization by telephone or other telecommunication device
543 within 24 hours after receipt of a request for prior
544 authorization; and
545 b. A 72-hour supply of the drug prescribed is provided in
546 an emergency or when the agency does not provide a response
547 within 24 hours as required by sub-subparagraph a.
548 2. A Medicaid preferred product list, which shall be a
549 listing of cost-effective therapeutic supplies recommended by
550 the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee
Page 22 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
551 established pursuant to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency
552 for each product class listed on the preferred product list and
553 reimbursed by the state Medicaid program through the pharmacy
554 point-of-sale. The agency may post the preferred product list
555 and updates to the list on the agency's website without
556 following the rulemaking procedures of chapter 120.
557 3. A list of high-cost drugs recommended by the Medicaid
558 Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee established pursuant
559 to s. 409.91195 and adopted by the agency, for the purpose of
560 coverage, reimbursement, or billing guidance. The agency may
561 post the high-cost drug list and updates to the list on an
562 Internet website without following the rulemaking procedures of
563 chapter 120.
564 4. A provider of prescribed drugs is reimbursed in an
565 amount not to exceed the lesser of the actual acquisition cost
566 based on the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services National
567 Average Drug Acquisition Cost pricing files plus a professional
568 dispensing fee, the wholesale acquisition cost plus a
569 professional dispensing fee, the state maximum allowable cost
570 plus a professional dispensing fee, or the usual and customary
571 charge billed by the provider.
572 5. A hospital facility administering long-acting
573 injectables for severe mental illness shall be reimbursed
574 separately from the diagnosis-related group. Long-acting
575 injectables administered for severe mental illness in a hospital
Page 23 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
576 facility setting shall be reimbursed at no less than the actual
577 acquisition cost of the drug.
578 6. The agency shall contract with a vendor to perform a
579 detailed fiscal impact study to evaluate the 340B Drug Pricing
580 Program administered by the Health Resources and Services
581 Administration. The study must evaluate 340B compliance, 340B
582 drug purchases, and reimbursement methodologies within the fee-
583 for-service program and Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program.
584 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care plans, pharmacy benefit
585 managers, and Medicaid providers shall submit to the agency all
586 data necessary for the completion of the study, including, but
587 not limited to, information related to drug purchasing,
588 reimbursement, billing and coding, and dispensing. Noncompliance
589 with the 340B data submission requirements of this subparagraph
590 may result in sanctions from the agency or the Board of
591 Pharmacy, as applicable. The agency shall submit the results of
592 the study to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
593 Speaker of the House of Representatives by June 30, 2027.
594 7.3. The agency shall develop and implement a process for
595 managing the drug therapies of Medicaid recipients who are using
596 significant numbers of prescribed drugs each month. The
597 management process may include, but is not limited to,
598 comprehensive, physician-directed medical-record reviews, claims
599 analyses, and case evaluations to determine the medical
600 necessity and appropriateness of a patient's treatment plan and
Page 24 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
601 drug therapies. The agency may contract with a private
602 organization to provide drug-program-management services. The
603 Medicaid drug benefit management program shall include
604 initiatives to manage drug therapies for HIV/AIDS patients,
605 patients using 20 or more unique prescriptions in a 180-day
606 period, and the top 1,000 patients in annual spending. The
607 agency shall enroll any Medicaid recipient in the drug benefit
608 management program if he or she meets the specifications of this
609 provision and is not enrolled in a Medicaid health maintenance
610 organization.
611 8.4. The agency may limit the size of its pharmacy network
612 based on need, competitive bidding, price negotiations,
613 credentialing, or similar criteria. The agency shall give
614 special consideration to rural areas in determining the size and
615 location of pharmacies included in the Medicaid pharmacy
616 network. A pharmacy credentialing process may include criteria
617 such as a pharmacy's full-service status, location, size,
618 patient educational programs, patient consultation, disease
619 management services, and other characteristics. The agency may
620 impose a moratorium on Medicaid pharmacy enrollment if it is
621 determined that it has a sufficient number of Medicaid-
622 participating providers. The agency must allow dispensing
623 practitioners to participate as a part of the Medicaid pharmacy
624 network regardless of the practitioner's proximity to any other
625 entity that is dispensing prescription drugs under the Medicaid
Page 25 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
626 program. A dispensing practitioner must meet all credentialing
627 requirements applicable to his or her practice, as determined by
628 the agency.
629 9.5. The agency shall develop and implement a program that
630 requires Medicaid practitioners who issue written prescriptions
631 for medicinal drugs to use a counterfeit-proof prescription pad
632 for Medicaid prescriptions. The agency shall require the use of
633 standardized counterfeit-proof prescription pads by prescribers
634 who issue written prescriptions for Medicaid recipients. The
635 agency may implement the program in targeted geographic areas or
636 statewide.
637 10.6. The agency may enter into arrangements that require
638 manufacturers of generic drugs prescribed to Medicaid recipients
639 to provide rebates of at least 15.1 percent of the average
640 manufacturer price for the manufacturer's generic products.
641 These arrangements shall require that if a generic-drug
642 manufacturer pays federal rebates for Medicaid-reimbursed drugs
643 at a level below 15.1 percent, the manufacturer must provide a
644 supplemental rebate to the state in an amount necessary to
645 achieve a 15.1-percent rebate level.
646 11.7. The agency may establish a preferred drug list as
647 described in this subsection, and, pursuant to the establishment
648 of such preferred drug list, negotiate supplemental rebates from
649 manufacturers that are in addition to those required by Title
650 XIX of the Social Security Act and at no less than 14 percent of
Page 26 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
651 the average manufacturer price as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1936
652 on the last day of a quarter unless the federal or supplemental
653 rebate, or both, equals or exceeds 29 percent. There is no upper
654 limit on the supplemental rebates the agency may negotiate. The
655 agency may determine that specific products, brand-name or
656 generic, are competitive at lower rebate percentages. Agreement
657 to pay the minimum supplemental rebate percentage guarantees a
658 manufacturer that the Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics
659 Committee will consider a product for inclusion on the preferred
660 drug list. However, a pharmaceutical manufacturer is not
661 guaranteed placement on the preferred drug list by simply paying
662 the minimum supplemental rebate. Agency decisions will be made
663 on the clinical efficacy of a drug and recommendations of the
664 Medicaid Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee, as well as
665 the price of competing products minus federal and state rebates.
666 The agency may contract with an outside agency or contractor to
667 conduct negotiations for supplemental rebates. For the purposes
668 of this section, the term "supplemental rebates" means cash
669 rebates. Value-added programs as a substitution for supplemental
670 rebates are prohibited. The agency may seek any federal waivers
671 to implement this initiative.
672 12.a.8.a. The agency may implement a Medicaid behavioral
673 drug management system. The agency may contract with a vendor
674 that has experience in operating behavioral drug management
675 systems to implement this program. The agency may seek federal
Page 27 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
676 waivers to implement this program.
677 b. The agency, in conjunction with the Department of
678 Children and Families, may implement the Medicaid behavioral
679 drug management system that is designed to improve the quality
680 of care and behavioral health prescribing practices based on
681 best practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to
682 medication plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed
683 drug costs and the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid
684 behavioral drugs. The program may include the following
685 elements:
686 (I) Provide for the development and adoption of best
687 practice guidelines for behavioral health-related drugs such as
688 antipsychotics, antidepressants, and medications for treating
689 bipolar disorders and other behavioral conditions; translate
690 them into practice; review behavioral health prescribers and
691 compare their prescribing patterns to a number of indicators
692 that are based on national standards; and determine deviations
693 from best practice guidelines.
694 (II) Implement processes for providing feedback to and
695 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials
696 and peer-to-peer consultation.
697 (III) Assess Medicaid beneficiaries who are outliers in
698 their use of behavioral health drugs with regard to the numbers
699 and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination drug
700 therapies, and other indicators of improper use of behavioral
Page 28 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
701 health drugs.
702 (IV) Alert prescribers to patients who fail to refill
703 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple same-
704 class behavioral health drugs, and may have other potential
705 medication problems.
706 (V) Track spending trends for behavioral health drugs and
707 deviation from best practice guidelines.
708 (VI) Use educational and technological approaches to
709 promote best practices, educate consumers, and train prescribers
710 in the use of practice guidelines.
711 (VII) Disseminate electronic and published materials.
712 (VIII) Hold statewide and regional conferences.
713 (IX) Implement a disease management program with a model
714 quality-based medication component for severely mentally ill
715 individuals and emotionally disturbed children who are high
716 users of care.
717 13.9. The agency shall implement a Medicaid prescription
718 drug management system.
719 a. The agency may contract with a vendor that has
720 experience in operating prescription drug management systems in
721 order to implement this system. Any management system that is
722 implemented in accordance with this subparagraph must rely on
723 cooperation between physicians and pharmacists to determine
724 appropriate practice patterns and clinical guidelines to improve
725 the prescribing, dispensing, and use of drugs in the Medicaid
Page 29 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
726 program. The agency may seek federal waivers to implement this
727 program.
728 b. The drug management system must be designed to improve
729 the quality of care and prescribing practices based on best
730 practice guidelines, improve patient adherence to medication
731 plans, reduce clinical risk, and lower prescribed drug costs and
732 the rate of inappropriate spending on Medicaid prescription
733 drugs. The program must:
734 (I) Provide for the adoption of best practice guidelines
735 for the prescribing and use of drugs in the Medicaid program,
736 including translating best practice guidelines into practice;
737 reviewing prescriber patterns and comparing them to indicators
738 that are based on national standards and practice patterns of
739 clinical peers in their community, statewide, and nationally;
740 and determine deviations from best practice guidelines.
741 (II) Implement processes for providing feedback to and
742 educating prescribers using best practice educational materials
743 and peer-to-peer consultation.
744 (III) Assess Medicaid recipients who are outliers in their
745 use of a single or multiple prescription drugs with regard to
746 the numbers and types of drugs taken, drug dosages, combination
747 drug therapies, and other indicators of improper use of
748 prescription drugs.
749 (IV) Alert prescribers to recipients who fail to refill
750 prescriptions in a timely fashion, are prescribed multiple drugs
Page 30 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
751 that may be redundant or contraindicated, or may have other
752 potential medication problems.
753 14.10. The agency may contract for drug rebate
754 administration, including, but not limited to, calculating
755 rebate amounts, invoicing manufacturers, negotiating disputes
756 with manufacturers, and maintaining a database of rebate
757 collections.
758 15.11. The agency may specify the preferred daily dosing
759 form or strength for the purpose of promoting best practices
760 with regard to the prescribing of certain drugs as specified in
761 the General Appropriations Act and ensuring cost-effective
762 prescribing practices.
763 16.12. The agency may require prior authorization for
764 Medicaid-covered prescribed drugs. The agency may prior-
765 authorize the use of a product:
766 a. For an indication not approved in labeling;
767 b. To comply with certain clinical guidelines; or
768 c. If the product has the potential for overuse, misuse,
769 or abuse.
770
771 The agency may require the prescribing professional to provide
772 information about the rationale and supporting medical evidence
773 for the use of a drug. The agency shall post prior
774 authorization, step-edit criteria and protocol, and updates to
775 the list of drugs that are subject to prior authorization on the
Page 31 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
776 agency's Internet website within 21 days after the prior
777 authorization and step-edit criteria and protocol and updates
778 are approved by the agency. For purposes of this subparagraph,
779 the term "step-edit" means an automatic electronic review of
780 certain medications subject to prior authorization.
781 17.13. The agency, in conjunction with the Pharmaceutical
782 and Therapeutics Committee, may require age-related prior
783 authorizations for certain prescribed drugs. The agency may
784 preauthorize the use of a drug for a recipient who may not meet
785 the age requirement or may exceed the length of therapy for use
786 of this product as recommended by the manufacturer and approved
787 by the Food and Drug Administration. Prior authorization may
788 require the prescribing professional to provide information
789 about the rationale and supporting medical evidence for the use
790 of a drug.
791 18.14. The agency shall implement a step-therapy prior
792 authorization approval process for medications excluded from the
793 preferred drug list. Medications listed on the preferred drug
794 list must be used within the previous 12 months before the
795 alternative medications that are not listed. The step-therapy
796 prior authorization may require the prescriber to use the
797 medications of a similar drug class or for a similar medical
798 indication unless contraindicated in the Food and Drug
799 Administration labeling. The trial period between the specified
800 steps may vary according to the medical indication. The step-
Page 32 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
801 therapy approval process shall be developed in accordance with
802 the committee as stated in s. 409.91195(7) and (8). A drug
803 product may be approved without meeting the step-therapy prior
804 authorization criteria if the prescribing physician provides the
805 agency with additional written medical or clinical documentation
806 that the product is medically necessary because:
807 a. There is not a drug on the preferred drug list to treat
808 the disease or medical condition which is an acceptable clinical
809 alternative;
810 b. The alternatives have been ineffective in the treatment
811 of the beneficiary's disease;
812 c. The drug product or medication of a similar drug class
813 is prescribed for the treatment of schizophrenia or schizotypal
814 or delusional disorders; prior authorization has been granted
815 previously for the prescribed drug; and the medication was
816 dispensed to the patient during the previous 12 months; or
817 d. Based on historical evidence and known characteristics
818 of the patient and the drug, the drug is likely to be
819 ineffective, or the number of doses have been ineffective.
820
821 The agency shall work with the physician to determine the best
822 alternative for the patient. The agency may adopt rules waiving
823 the requirements for written clinical documentation for specific
824 drugs in limited clinical situations.
825 19.15. The agency shall implement a return and reuse
Page 33 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
826 program for drugs dispensed by pharmacies to institutional
827 recipients, which includes payment of a $5 restocking fee for
828 the implementation and operation of the program. The return and
829 reuse program shall be implemented electronically and in a
830 manner that promotes efficiency. The program must permit a
831 pharmacy to exclude drugs from the program if it is not
832 practical or cost-effective for the drug to be included and must
833 provide for the return to inventory of drugs that cannot be
834 credited or returned in a cost-effective manner. The agency
835 shall determine if the program has reduced the amount of
836 Medicaid prescription drugs which are destroyed on an annual
837 basis and if there are additional ways to ensure more
838 prescription drugs are not destroyed which could safely be
839 reused.
840 (14) Neither this section nor this chapter prevents the
841 agency from conducting retrospective reviews, investigations,
842 analyses, audits, or any combination thereof to determine
843 possible fraud, abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the
844 state Medicaid program pursuant to s. 409.913, including, but
845 not limited to, reviews in which the services were the subject
846 of a utilization review or prior authorization process.
847 Section 7. Paragraph (a) of subsection (4) and paragraph
848 (b) of subsection (6) of section 409.9122, Florida Statutes, are
849 amended to read:
850 409.9122 Medicaid managed care enrollment; HIV/AIDS
Page 34 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
851 patients; procedures; data collection; accounting; information
852 system; medical loss ratio.—
853 (4) The agency shall maintain and operate the Medicaid
854 Encounter Data System to collect, process, store, and report on
855 covered services provided to all Florida Medicaid recipients
856 enrolled in prepaid managed care plans.
857 (a) Prepaid Managed care plans shall submit encounter
858 data, including denied encounters and encounters resulting from
859 a capitated arrangement, electronically in a format that
860 complies with the Health Insurance Portability and
861 Accountability Act provisions for electronic claims and in
862 accordance with deadlines established by the agency. Prepaid
863 Managed care plans must certify that the data reported is
864 accurate and complete.
865 (6) The agency shall establish, and managed care plans
866 shall use, a uniform method of accounting for and reporting
867 medical and nonmedical costs.
868 (b) The agency is responsible for validating the financial
869 data submitted by the plans. The agency shall develop methods
870 and protocols for ongoing analysis of data that adjusts for
871 differences in characteristics of plan enrollees to allow
872 comparison among plans and against expected levels of
873 expenditures. The analysis shall be used to identify possible
874 cases of overspending on administrative costs, payment amounts
875 in excess of market rates, or underspending on medical services,
Page 35 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
876 or potential managed care plan fraud, waste, and abuse. Such
877 analysis shall also be used in the rate setting process.
878 Section 8. Paragraph (e) of subsection (1) and subsections
879 (2) and (6) of section 409.913, Florida Statutes, are amended to
880 read:
881 409.913 Oversight of the integrity of the Medicaid
882 program.—The agency shall operate a program to oversee the
883 activities of Florida Medicaid recipients, and providers and
884 their representatives, to ensure that fraudulent and abusive
885 behavior and neglect of recipients occur to the minimum extent
886 possible, and to recover overpayments and impose sanctions as
887 appropriate. Each January 15, the agency and the Medicaid Fraud
888 Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs shall submit a
889 report to the Legislature documenting the effectiveness of the
890 state's efforts to control Medicaid fraud and abuse and to
891 recover Medicaid overpayments during the previous fiscal year.
892 The report must describe the number of cases opened and
893 investigated each year; the sources of the cases opened; the
894 disposition of the cases closed each year; the amount of
895 overpayments alleged in preliminary and final audit letters; the
896 number and amount of fines or penalties imposed; any reductions
897 in overpayment amounts negotiated in settlement agreements or by
898 other means; the amount of final agency determinations of
899 overpayments; the amount deducted from federal claiming as a
900 result of overpayments; the amount of overpayments recovered
Page 36 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
901 each year; the amount of cost of investigation recovered each
902 year; the average length of time to collect from the time the
903 case was opened until the overpayment is paid in full; the
904 amount determined as uncollectible and the portion of the
905 uncollectible amount subsequently reclaimed from the Federal
906 Government; the number of providers, by type, that are
907 terminated from participation in the Medicaid program as a
908 result of fraud and abuse; and all costs associated with
909 discovering and prosecuting cases of Medicaid overpayments and
910 making recoveries in such cases. The report must also document
911 actions taken to prevent overpayments and the number of
912 providers prevented from enrolling in or reenrolling in the
913 Medicaid program as a result of documented Medicaid fraud and
914 abuse and must include policy recommendations necessary to
915 prevent or recover overpayments and changes necessary to prevent
916 and detect Medicaid fraud. All policy recommendations in the
917 report must include a detailed fiscal analysis, including, but
918 not limited to, implementation costs, estimated savings to the
919 Medicaid program, and the return on investment. The agency must
920 submit the policy recommendations and fiscal analyses in the
921 report to the appropriate estimating conference, pursuant to s.
922 216.137, by February 15 of each year. The agency and the
923 Medicaid Fraud Control Unit of the Department of Legal Affairs
924 each must include detailed unit-specific performance standards,
925 benchmarks, and metrics in the report, including projected cost
Page 37 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
926 savings to the state Medicaid program during the following
927 fiscal year.
928 (1) For the purposes of this section, the term:
929 (e) "Overpayment" includes any amount that is not
930 authorized to be paid by the Medicaid program or that should not
931 have been paid, including payments made whether paid as a result
932 of inaccurate or improper cost reporting, improper claiming,
933 unacceptable practices, fraud, abuse, or mistake, and may
934 include amounts paid for goods or services that were the subject
935 of a utilization review or prior authorization process.
936 (2) The agency shall conduct, or cause to be conducted by
937 contract or otherwise, reviews, investigations, analyses,
938 audits, or any combination thereof, to determine possible fraud,
939 abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the Medicaid program
940 and shall report the findings of any overpayments in audit
941 reports as appropriate. An overpayment determination may be
942 based upon retrospective reviews, investigations, analyses,
943 audits, or any combination thereof to determine possible fraud,
944 abuse, overpayment, or recipient neglect in the Medicaid
945 program. At least 5 percent of all audits shall be conducted on
946 a random basis. As part of its ongoing fraud detection
947 activities, the agency shall identify and monitor, by contract
948 or otherwise, patterns of overutilization of Medicaid services
949 based on state averages. The agency shall track Medicaid
950 provider prescription and billing patterns and evaluate them
Page 38 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
951 against Medicaid medical necessity criteria and coverage and
952 limitation guidelines adopted by rule. Medical necessity
953 determination requires that service be consistent with symptoms
954 or confirmed diagnosis of illness or injury under treatment and
955 not in excess of the patient's needs. The agency shall conduct
956 reviews of provider exceptions to peer group norms and shall,
957 using statistical methodologies, provider profiling, and
958 analysis of billing patterns, detect and investigate abnormal or
959 unusual increases in billing or payment of claims for Medicaid
960 services and medically unnecessary provision of services.
961 (6) Any notice required to be given to a provider under
962 this section is presumed to be sufficient notice if sent to the
963 mailing address last shown on the provider enrollment file. It
964 is the responsibility of the provider to furnish and keep the
965 agency informed of the provider's current mailing and service
966 addresses address. United States Postal Service or other common
967 carrier's proof of mailing or certified or registered mailing of
968 such notice to the provider at the address shown on the provider
969 enrollment file constitutes sufficient proof of notice. Any
970 notice required to be given to the agency by this section must
971 be sent to the agency at an address designated by rule.
972 Section 9. Present subsections (2) through (18) of section
973 409.962, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3)
974 through (19), respectively, and a new subsection (2) is added to
975 that section, to read:
Page 39 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
976 409.962 Definitions.—As used in this part, except as
977 otherwise specifically provided, the term:
978 (2) "Affiliate," including the terms "affiliated with" and
979 "affiliation," means a person, as construed in s. 1.01(3), who:
980 (a) Directly or indirectly, through one or more
981 intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common
982 control with a specified entity or person. The term includes
983 parent and subsidiary entities; or
984 (b) Is deemed a "related party" according to the standards
985 adopted by the Financial Accounting Standards Board.
986 Section 10. Subsections (1) and (2) and paragraph (h) of
987 subsection (3) of section 409.967, Florida Statutes, are
988 amended, and subsection (5) is added to that section, to read:
989 409.967 Managed care plan accountability.—
990 (1) CONTRACT PROCUREMENT PROCESS.—Beginning with the
991 contract procurement process initiated during the 2023 calendar
992 year, the agency shall establish a 6-year contract with each
993 managed care plan selected through the procurement process
994 described in s. 409.966. A plan contract may not be renewed;
995 however, the agency may extend the term of a plan contract to
996 cover any delays during the transition to a new plan. The agency
997 shall extend until December 31, 2024, the term of existing plan
998 contracts awarded pursuant to the invitation to negotiate
999 published in July 2017.
1000 (2) CONTRACT REQUIREMENTS.—The agency shall establish such
Page 40 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1001 contract requirements as are necessary for the operation of the
1002 statewide managed care program. The contracts must require any
1003 third-party administrative entity contracted by a plan to adhere
1004 to all requirements specific to the state Medicaid program. In
1005 addition to any other provisions the agency may deem necessary,
1006 the contract must require:
1007 (a) Physician compensation.—Managed care plans are
1008 expected to coordinate care, manage chronic disease, and prevent
1009 the need for more costly services. Effective care management
1010 should enable plans to redirect available resources and increase
1011 compensation for physicians. Plans achieve this performance
1012 standard when physician payment rates equal or exceed Medicare
1013 rates for similar services. The agency may impose fines or other
1014 sanctions on a plan that fails to meet this performance standard
1015 after 2 years of continuous operation.
1016 (b) Emergency services.—Managed care plans shall pay for
1017 services required by ss. 395.1041 and 401.45 and rendered by a
1018 noncontracted provider. The plans must comply with s. 641.3155.
1019 Reimbursement for services under this paragraph is the lesser
1020 of:
1021 1. The provider's charges;
1022 2. The usual and customary provider charges for similar
1023 services in the community where the services were provided;
1024 3. The charge mutually agreed to by the entity and the
1025 provider within 60 days after submittal of the claim; or
Page 41 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1026 4. The Medicaid rate, which, for the purposes of this
1027 paragraph, means the amount the provider would collect from the
1028 agency on a fee-for-service basis, less any amounts for the
1029 indirect costs of medical education and the direct costs of
1030 graduate medical education that are otherwise included in the
1031 agency's fee-for-service payment, as required under 42 U.S.C. s.
1032 1396u-2(b)(2)(D). For the purpose of establishing the amounts
1033 specified in this subparagraph, the agency shall publish on its
1034 website annually, or more frequently as needed, the applicable
1035 fee-for-service fee schedules and their effective dates, less
1036 any amounts for indirect costs of medical education and direct
1037 costs of graduate medical education that are otherwise included
1038 in the agency's fee-for-service payments.
1039 (c) Access.—
1040 1. The agency shall establish specific standards for the
1041 number, type, and regional distribution of providers in managed
1042 care plan networks to ensure access to care for both adults and
1043 children. Each plan must maintain a regionwide network of
1044 providers in sufficient numbers to meet the access standards for
1045 specific medical services for all recipients enrolled in the
1046 plan. The exclusive use of mail-order pharmacies may not be
1047 sufficient to meet network access standards. Consistent with the
1048 standards established by the agency, provider networks may
1049 include providers located outside the region. Each plan shall
1050 establish and maintain an accurate and complete electronic
Page 42 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1051 database of contracted providers, including information about
1052 licensure or registration, locations and hours of operation,
1053 specialty credentials and other certifications, specific
1054 performance indicators, and such other information as the agency
1055 deems necessary. The database must be available online to both
1056 the agency and the public and have the capability to compare the
1057 availability of providers to network adequacy standards and to
1058 accept and display feedback from each provider's patients. Each
1059 plan shall submit quarterly reports to the agency identifying
1060 the number of enrollees assigned to each primary care provider.
1061 The agency shall conduct, or contract for, systematic and
1062 continuous testing of the provider network databases maintained
1063 by each plan to confirm accuracy, confirm that behavioral health
1064 providers are accepting enrollees, and confirm that enrollees
1065 have access to behavioral health services.
1066 2. Each managed care plan must publish any prescribed drug
1067 formulary or preferred drug list on the plan's website in a
1068 manner that is accessible to and searchable by enrollees and
1069 providers. The plan must update the list within 24 hours after
1070 making a change. Each plan must ensure that the prior
1071 authorization process for prescribed drugs is readily accessible
1072 to health care providers, including posting appropriate contact
1073 information on its website and providing timely responses to
1074 providers. For Medicaid recipients diagnosed with hemophilia who
1075 have been prescribed anti-hemophilic-factor replacement
Page 43 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1076 products, the agency shall provide for those products and
1077 hemophilia overlay services through the agency's hemophilia
1078 disease management program.
1079 3. Managed care plans, and their fiscal agents or
1080 intermediaries, must accept prior authorization requests for any
1081 service electronically.
1082 4. Managed care plans serving children in the care and
1083 custody of the Department of Children and Families must maintain
1084 complete medical, dental, and behavioral health encounter
1085 information and participate in making such information available
1086 to the department or the applicable contracted community-based
1087 care lead agency for use in providing comprehensive and
1088 coordinated case management. The agency and the department shall
1089 establish an interagency agreement to provide guidance for the
1090 format, confidentiality, recipient, scope, and method of
1091 information to be made available and the deadlines for
1092 submission of the data. The scope of information available to
1093 the department shall be the data that managed care plans are
1094 required to submit to the agency. The agency shall determine the
1095 plan's compliance with standards for access to medical, dental,
1096 and behavioral health services; the use of medications; and
1097 followup on all medically necessary services recommended as a
1098 result of early and periodic screening, diagnosis, and
1099 treatment.
1100 (d) Quality care.—Managed care plans shall provide, or
Page 44 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1101 contract for the provision of, care coordination to facilitate
1102 the appropriate delivery of behavioral health care services in
1103 the least restrictive setting with treatment and recovery
1104 capabilities that address the needs of the patient. Services
1105 shall be provided in a manner that integrates behavioral health
1106 services and primary care. Plans shall be required to achieve
1107 specific behavioral health outcome standards, established by the
1108 agency in consultation with the department.
1109 (e) Encounter data.—The agency shall maintain and operate
1110 a Medicaid Encounter Data System to collect, process, store, and
1111 report on covered services provided to all Medicaid recipients
1112 enrolled in prepaid plans.
1113 1. Each prepaid plan must comply with the agency's
1114 reporting requirements for the Medicaid Encounter Data System.
1115 Prepaid plans must submit encounter data electronically in a
1116 format that complies with the Health Insurance Portability and
1117 Accountability Act provisions for electronic claims and in
1118 accordance with deadlines established by the agency. Prepaid
1119 plans must certify that the data reported is accurate and
1120 complete.
1121 2. The agency is responsible for validating the data
1122 submitted by the plans. The agency shall develop methods and
1123 protocols for ongoing analysis of the encounter data that
1124 adjusts for differences in characteristics of prepaid plan
1125 enrollees to allow comparison of service utilization among plans
Page 45 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1126 and against expected levels of use. The analysis shall be used
1127 to identify possible cases of systemic underutilization or
1128 denials of claims and inappropriate service utilization such as
1129 higher-than-expected emergency department encounters. The
1130 analysis shall provide periodic feedback to the plans and enable
1131 the agency to establish corrective action plans when necessary.
1132 One of the focus areas for the analysis shall be the use of
1133 prescription drugs.
1134 3. The agency shall make encounter data available to those
1135 plans accepting enrollees who are assigned to them from other
1136 plans leaving a region.
1137 4. The agency shall annually produce a report entitled
1138 "Analysis of Potentially Preventable Health Care Events of
1139 Florida Medicaid Enrollees." The report must include, but need
1140 not be limited to, an analysis of the potentially preventable
1141 hospital emergency department visits, hospital admissions, and
1142 hospital readmissions that occurred during the previous state
1143 fiscal year which may have been prevented with better access to
1144 primary care, improved medication management, or better
1145 coordination of care, reported by age, eligibility group,
1146 managed care plan, and region, including conditions contributing
1147 to each potentially preventable event or category of potentially
1148 preventable events. The agency may include any other data or
1149 analysis parameters to augment the report which it deems
1150 pertinent to the analysis. The report must demonstrate trends
Page 46 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1151 using applicable historical data. The agency shall submit the
1152 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the
1153 Speaker of the House of Representatives by October 1, 2024, and
1154 each October 1 thereafter. The agency may contract with a third-
1155 party vendor to produce the report required under this
1156 subparagraph.
1157 (f) Continuous improvement.—The agency shall establish
1158 specific performance standards and expected milestones or
1159 timelines for improving performance over the term of the
1160 contract.
1161 1. Each managed care plan shall establish an internal
1162 health care quality improvement system, including enrollee
1163 satisfaction and disenrollment surveys. The quality improvement
1164 system must include incentives and disincentives for network
1165 providers.
1166 2. Each managed care plan must collect and report the
1167 Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS)
1168 measures, the federal Core Set of Children's Health Care Quality
1169 measures, and the federal Core Set of Adult Health Care Quality
1170 Measures, as specified by the agency. Each plan must collect and
1171 report the Adult Core Set behavioral health measures beginning
1172 with data reports for the 2025 calendar year. Each plan must
1173 stratify reported measures by age, sex, race, ethnicity, primary
1174 language, and whether the enrollee received a Social Security
1175 Administration determination of disability for purposes of
Page 47 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1176 Supplemental Security Income beginning with data reports for the
1177 2026 calendar year. A plan's performance on these measures must
1178 be published on the plan's website in a manner that allows
1179 recipients to reliably compare the performance of plans. The
1180 agency shall use the measures as a tool to monitor plan
1181 performance.
1182 3. Each managed care plan must be accredited by the
1183 National Committee for Quality Assurance, the Joint Commission,
1184 or another nationally recognized accrediting body, or have
1185 initiated the accreditation process, within 1 year after the
1186 contract is executed. For any plan not accredited within 18
1187 months after executing the contract, the agency shall suspend
1188 automatic assignment under ss. 409.977 and 409.984.
1189 (g) Program integrity.—Each managed care plan shall
1190 establish program integrity functions and activities to reduce
1191 the incidence of fraud and abuse, including, at a minimum:
1192 1. A provider credentialing system and ongoing provider
1193 monitoring, including maintenance of written provider
1194 credentialing policies and procedures which comply with federal
1195 and agency guidelines;
1196 2. An effective prepayment and postpayment review process
1197 including, but not limited to, data analysis, system editing,
1198 and auditing of network providers;
1199 3. Procedures for reporting instances of fraud and abuse
1200 pursuant to chapter 641;
Page 48 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1201 4. Administrative and management arrangements or
1202 procedures, including a mandatory compliance plan, designed to
1203 prevent fraud and abuse; and
1204 5. Designation of a program integrity compliance officer.
1205 (h) Grievance resolution.—Consistent with federal law,
1206 each managed care plan shall establish and the agency shall
1207 approve an internal process for reviewing and responding to
1208 grievances from enrollees. Each plan shall submit quarterly
1209 reports on the number, description, and outcome of grievances
1210 filed by enrollees.
1211 (i) Penalties.—
1212 1. Withdrawal and enrollment reduction.—Managed care plans
1213 that reduce enrollment levels or leave a region before the end
1214 of the contract term must reimburse the agency for the cost of
1215 enrollment changes and other transition activities. If more than
1216 one plan leaves a region at the same time, costs must be shared
1217 by the departing plans proportionate to their enrollments. In
1218 addition to the payment of costs, departing provider services
1219 networks must pay a per-enrollee penalty of up to 3 months'
1220 payment and continue to provide services to the enrollee for 90
1221 days or until the enrollee is enrolled in another plan,
1222 whichever occurs first. In addition to payment of costs, all
1223 other departing plans must pay a penalty of 25 percent of that
1224 portion of the minimum surplus maintained pursuant to s.
1225 641.225(1) which is attributable to the provision of coverage to
Page 49 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1226 Medicaid enrollees. Plans shall provide at least 180 days'
1227 notice to the agency before withdrawing from a region. If a
1228 managed care plan leaves a region before the end of the contract
1229 term, the agency shall terminate all contracts with that plan in
1230 other regions pursuant to the termination procedures in
1231 subparagraph 3.
1232 2. Encounter data.—If a plan fails to comply with the
1233 encounter data reporting requirements of this section for 30
1234 days, the agency must assess a fine of $5,000 per day for each
1235 day of noncompliance beginning on the 31st day. On the 31st day,
1236 the agency must notify the plan that the agency will initiate
1237 contract termination procedures on the 90th day unless the plan
1238 comes into compliance before that date.
1239 3. Termination.—If the agency terminates more than one
1240 regional contract with the same managed care plan due to
1241 noncompliance with the requirements of this section, the agency
1242 shall terminate all the regional contracts held by that plan.
1243 When terminating multiple contracts, the agency must develop a
1244 plan to provide for the transition of enrollees to other plans,
1245 and phase in the terminations over a time period sufficient to
1246 ensure a smooth transition.
1247 (j) Prompt payment.—Managed care plans shall comply with
1248 ss. 641.315, 641.3155, and 641.513.
1249 (k) Electronic claims.—Managed care plans, and their
1250 fiscal agents or intermediaries, shall accept electronic claims
Page 50 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1251 in compliance with federal standards.
1252 (l) Fair payment.—Provider service networks must ensure
1253 that no entity licensed under chapter 395 with a controlling
1254 interest in the network charges a Medicaid managed care plan
1255 more than the amount paid to that provider by the provider
1256 service network for the same service.
1257 (m) Itemized payment.—Any claims payment to a provider by
1258 a managed care plan, or by a fiscal agent or intermediary of the
1259 plan, must be accompanied by an itemized accounting of the
1260 individual claims included in the payment including, but not
1261 limited to, the enrollee's name, the date of service, the
1262 procedure code, the amount of reimbursement, and the
1263 identification of the plan on whose behalf the payment is made.
1264 (n) Provider dispute resolution.—Disputes between a plan
1265 and a provider may be resolved as described in s. 408.7057.
1266 (o) Transparency.—Managed care plans shall comply with ss.
1267 627.6385(3) and 641.54(7).
1268 (3) ACHIEVED SAVINGS REBATE.—
1269 (h) The following may not be included as allowable
1270 expenses in calculating income for determining the achieved
1271 savings rebate:
1272 1. Payment of achieved savings rebates.
1273 2. Any financial incentive payments made to the plan
1274 outside of the capitation rate.
1275 3. Any financial disincentive payments levied by the state
Page 51 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1276 or Federal Government.
1277 4. Expenses associated with any lobbying or political
1278 activities.
1279 5. The cash value or equivalent cash value of bonuses of
1280 any type paid or awarded to the plan's executive staff, other
1281 than base salary.
1282 6. Reserves and reserve accounts.
1283 7. Administrative costs, including, but not limited to,
1284 reinsurance expenses, interest payments, depreciation expenses,
1285 bad debt expenses, and outstanding claims expenses in excess of
1286 actuarially sound maximum amounts set by the agency.
1287 8. Payments to affiliated entities as defined in s.
1288 409.962 in excess of market rates, as determined by the agency.
1289
1290 The agency shall consider these and other factors in developing
1291 contracts that establish shared savings arrangements.
1292 (5) AFFILIATED ENTITIES AND RELATED PARTIES.—
1293 (a) The agency shall ensure oversight of affiliated
1294 entities and related parties as defined in s. 409.962 within the
1295 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program. This includes, but is
1296 not limited to, examining financial records and self-referral
1297 data for any managed care plan providing services within the
1298 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care program utilizing affiliated
1299 entities and related parties within their business model.
1300 (b) The agency shall consider data obtained pursuant to
Page 52 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1301 paragraph (a) and the findings of the annual assessment required
1302 under s. 409.9675(3) when determining the final medical loss
1303 ratio as specified in subsection (4) and during the rate setting
1304 process.
1305 Section 11. Section 409.9675, Florida Statutes, is created
1306 to read:
1307 409.9675 Affiliated entities and controlling interest;
1308 reports required.—
1309 (1) As used in this part, the term "control," including
1310 the terms "controlling," "controlled by," and "under common
1311 control with," means the possession, direct or indirect, of the
1312 power to direct or cause the direction of the management and
1313 policies of a person, whether through the ownership or voting
1314 securities, by contract other than a commercial contract for
1315 goods or nonmanagement services, or otherwise, unless the power
1316 is the result of an official position with or corporate office
1317 held by the person. This definition applies regardless of
1318 whether such power is affirmative or negative or whether such
1319 power is actually used. Control is presumed to exist, but is not
1320 limited to, when any affiliate or person, as construed in s.
1321 1.01(3):
1322 (a) Directly or indirectly owns, controls, holds the power
1323 to vote, or holds proxies representing 10 percent or more of any
1324 class of the voting securities of any other person.
1325 (b) Shares common ownership with any person, has an
Page 53 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1326 investor or is a holder of an ownership interest in any person,
1327 exercises control in any manner over the election of a majority
1328 of the directors or of individuals exercising similar functions
1329 of any person, has the power to exercise controlling influence
1330 over the management of any person, or serves as a working
1331 majority of the board of directors, managers, or the officers of
1332 a person, who is:
1333 1. A provider or a member of a provider group or group
1334 practice as defined in s. 456.053 under the managed care plan;
1335 or
1336 2. A person responsible for providing any pharmacy
1337 services, pharmaceuticals, diagnostics, care coordination, care
1338 delivery, health care services, medical equipment,
1339 administrative services, or financial services under the managed
1340 care plan.
1341 (2) By March 31, 2027, and annually thereafter, each
1342 managed care plan shall report to the agency and the Office of
1343 Insurance Regulation, in the manner prescribed by the agency,
1344 all of the following:
1345 (a) Any person, as construed in s. 1.01(3), controlled by
1346 or affiliated with the managed care plan, including, but not
1347 limited to, any provider, provider group, group practice as
1348 defined in s. 456.053(3), or person responsible for providing
1349 any pharmacy services, pharmaceuticals, diagnostics, care
1350 coordination, care delivery, health care services, medical
Page 54 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1351 equipment, administrative services, or financial services for,
1352 to, or on behalf of the managed care plan.
1353 (b) Any affiliation of any kind or nature with any person,
1354 as construed in s. 1.01(3), which, either directly or
1355 indirectly, through one or more intermediaries has an investment
1356 or ownership interest representing 10 percent or more, shares
1357 common ownership, or has an investor or a holder of an ownership
1358 interest representing 10 percent or more, with any person
1359 providing pharmacy services, diagnostics, care coordination,
1360 care delivery, health care services, medical equipment,
1361 administrative services, or financial services for, to, or on
1362 behalf of the managed care plan.
1363 (c) For any affiliation reported under paragraph (a) or
1364 paragraph (b), the report must include all of the following:
1365 1. The percentage of ownership or control of any person or
1366 affiliate with whom the managed care plan or prepaid plan has
1367 had business transactions during the 12-month period in the
1368 annual achieved savings rebate financial reporting required
1369 under s. 409.967(3) and identification of the services provided
1370 under the contract or contracts involved in such business
1371 transactions; and
1372 2. Any significant business transactions between the
1373 managed care plan and any affiliated person during the 12-month
1374 period in the annual financial reporting required under s.
1375 409.967(3).
Page 55 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1376 (3) Each managed care plan shall report any change in
1377 information required by subsection (1) to the agency and the
1378 Office of Insurance Regulation in writing within 60 days after
1379 such change occurs.
1380 (4) By December 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
1381 agency shall calculate, analyze, and publicly report on the
1382 agency's website an assessment of affiliated entity payment
1383 transactions in the Medicaid program for medical benefit and
1384 administrative costs as reported for purposes of the achieved
1385 savings rebate. The baseline assessment, at a minimum, must
1386 include achieved savings rebate transactions for the years 2021,
1387 2022, and 2023; the amount and associated percentage of
1388 affiliated entity payments within the medical loss ratio; and
1389 the payment deviation percentages and associated amounts at the
1390 Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System level for affiliated
1391 entities as compared to nonaffiliated entities. The assessment
1392 must also compare payment amounts for value-based or alternative
1393 payment arrangements.
1394 Section 12. Paragraph (c) is added to subsection (5) of
1395 section 409.973, Florida Statutes, to read:
1396 409.973 Benefits.—
1397 (5) PROVISION OF DENTAL SERVICES.—
1398 (c) By July 1, 2027, the agency shall implement an
1399 Integrated Managed Care Pilot Program in which Medicaid
1400 recipients in designated regions of this state shall receive
Page 56 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1401 both medical and dental covered benefits through the same
1402 managed medical assistance plan.
1403 1. The agency shall submit a request for federal approval
1404 for the pilot program by August 1, 2026, and to implement the
1405 pilot program in Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Regions A and B
1406 by July 1, 2027, contingent upon federal approval.
1407 2. The agency is directed to amend contracts awarded to
1408 managed care plans for the provision of managed medical
1409 assistance services in Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Regions A
1410 and B to include coverage of state plan dental services
1411 effective upon implementation of the pilot program. Managed care
1412 plans providing managed medical assistance services in Regions A
1413 and B must begin providing dental services by July 1, 2027, for
1414 all Medicaid recipients in their region previously eligible for
1415 services under the statewide prepaid dental program and must
1416 comply with contractual continuity of care requirements. Managed
1417 care plans must also agree to provide the same level of service
1418 as the prepaid dental plans in their region, including expanded
1419 benefits offered by those plans at no cost to the state. Managed
1420 care plans that provide dental services in Regions A and B must
1421 maintain a minimum dental medical loss ratio of 85 percent,
1422 calculated in accordance with 42 C.F.R. 438.8. The agency shall
1423 separately identify the amounts included in the capitation rates
1424 for dental services. The managed care plans shall recognize
1425 existing provider credentialing performed by the prepaid dental
Page 57 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1426 plans for providers who remain in good standing with the state
1427 Medicaid program for a period not to exceed 12 months after the
1428 effective date of implementation of the pilot program. If a
1429 managed care plan fails to execute contracts or contract
1430 amendments needed to implement the pilot program, the agency
1431 must terminate all contracts with that plan. Contracts in
1432 Statewide Medicaid Managed Care Regions A and B which provide
1433 services under the statewide prepaid Medicaid dental health
1434 program authorized by paragraph (b) terminate upon
1435 implementation of the pilot program in these regions.
1436 3. The agency shall establish specific measures of access,
1437 quality, and costs for evaluations of the pilot program. The
1438 agency shall contract with an independent evaluator to conduct
1439 the program evaluations. The evaluations must compare the
1440 experience in the regions participating in the pilot program
1441 with the experience in the regions not participating in the
1442 pilot program. The evaluations must include consideration of all
1443 of the following, at a minimum:
1444 a. Utilization of routine preventive dental care,
1445 including routine preventive dental care provided as expanded
1446 benefits, and avoidable emergency or surgical dental services.
1447 b. Dental health outcomes and other associated health
1448 outcomes impacted by dental health.
1449 c. Recipient satisfaction and continuity of care.
1450 d. Impact on the provider network, including any increase
Page 58 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1451 in the number of dental practitioners willing to accept
1452 Medicaid.
1453 e. Costs of Medicaid services for the pilot program
1454 population with specific focus on utilization, outcomes, and
1455 costs associated with children and disabled populations.
1456 4. The agency shall submit a report on the performance of
1457 the pilot program to the Governor, the President of the Senate,
1458 and the Speaker of the House of Representatives beginning on
1459 December 1, 2028, and annually thereafter.
1460 Section 13. Subsection (1) of section 409.91196, Florida
1461 Statutes, is amended to read:
1462 409.91196 Supplemental rebate agreements; public records
1463 and public meetings exemption.—
1464 (1) The rebate amount, percent of rebate, manufacturer's
1465 pricing, and supplemental rebate, and other trade secrets as
1466 defined in s. 688.002 that the agency has identified for use in
1467 negotiations, held by the Agency for Health Care Administration
1468 under s. 409.912(5)(a)11. s. 409.912(5)(a)7. are confidential
1469 and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State
1470 Constitution.
1471 Section 14. Subsection (1) of section 627.42392, Florida
1472 Statutes, is amended to read:
1473 627.42392 Prior authorization.—
1474 (1) As used in this section, the term "health insurer"
1475 means an authorized insurer offering health insurance as defined
Page 59 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1453 2026
1476 in s. 624.603, a managed care plan as defined in s. 409.962(12)
1477 s. 409.962(10), or a health maintenance organization as defined
1478 in s. 641.19(12).
1479 Section 15. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 60 of 60
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1453-00